Hawaii statutes.
§346-54 Report to the legislature. On
or before January 1 of odd-numbered years the director shall submit a
report to the legislature concerning the adequacy of the assistance allowance
established by this chapter.

In addition, should general fund expenditures
for financial assistance and medical payment increase at a rate greater than
the rate of increase in general fund tax revenues in any fiscal year, the
director shall report such increases to the legislature and make cost control
recommendations that will control increases in general fund public assistance
expenditures. Cost control recommendations shall include, but not be limited
to, the following:

(1) Changes in eligibility standards;

(2) Adjustments to the assistance allowance;

(3) Alternatives to financial assistance for meeting
the needs essential to maintaining an adequate standard of living; and

(4) Adjustments to medical payment fees and levels of
service. [L 1975, c 145, pt of §1(3); am L 1978, c 104, §2; am L 1979, c 52,
§4; am L 1987, c 344, §3; am L 1988, c 327, §3]

Revision Note

In the second paragraph, (1) to (4) reformatted as paragraphs
(1) to (4) and punctuation changed pursuant to §23G-15.

Previous
Vol07_Ch0346-0398
Next